Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1115
Dentistry practice, defined.

Any person shall be deemed to be practicing dentistry who:

(1) Performs, or attempts or professes to perform, any dental operation or oral surgery or dental service of any kind, gratuitously or for a salary, fee, money, or other remuneration paid, or to be paid directly or indirectly, to such person or to any other person or agency who is a proprietor of a place where dental operations, oral surgery, or dental services are performed;

(2) Directly or indirectly, by any means or method, takes impression of the human tooth, teeth, jaws, or performs any phase of any operation incident to the replacement of a part of a tooth;

(3) Supplies artificial substitutes for the natural teeth or furnishes, supplies, constructs, reproduces, or repairs any prosthetic denture, bridge, appliance, or other structure to be worn in the human mouth, except on the written work authorization of a duly licensed and registered dentist;

(4) Places such appliance or structure in the human mouth, adjusts or attempts or professes to adjust the same, or delivers the same to any person other than the dentist upon whose work authorization the work was performed;

(5) Professes to the public by any method to furnish, supply, construct, reproduce, or repair any prosthetic denture, bridge, appliance, or other structure to be worn in the human mouth;

(6) Diagnoses, professes to diagnose, prescribes for, professes to prescribe for, treats, or professes to treat disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, or physical condition of the human teeth or jaws, or adjacent structure;

(7) Extracts or attempts to extract human teeth or corrects or attempts to correct malformations of teeth or of the jaws;

(8) Repairs or fills cavities in the human teeth;

(9) Diagnoses, makes, and adjusts appliances to artificial casts or malposed teeth for treatment of the malposed teeth in the human mouth, with or without instruction;

(10) Uses a roentgen or X-ray machine for the purpose of taking dental X-rays or roentgenograms;

(11) Gives or professes to give interpretations or readings of dental X-rays or roentgenograms;

(12) Administers an anesthetic of any nature in connection with a dental operation;

(13) Uses the words dentist, dental surgeon, or oral surgeon, the letters D.D.S. or D.M.D., or any other words, letters, title, or descriptive matter which in any way represents such person as being able to diagnose, treat, prescribe, or operate for any disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, or physical condition of the teeth or jaws or adjacent structures; or

(14) States, professes, or permits to be stated or professed by any means or method whatsoever that he or she can perform or will attempt to perform dental operations or render a diagnosis connected therewith.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 82, p. 475;

C.S.1929, § 71-1201;

R.S.1943, § 71-183;

Laws 1951, c. 226, § 1, p. 821;

Laws 1951, c. 227, § 1, p. 825;

Laws 1971, LB 587, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-183;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 448.

Alcoholic liquor, possession and use in practice, see section 53-168.06.

Dental education loan program, Rural Health Systems and Professional Incentive Act, see section 71-5650.